Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, subdivision 1m, is amended to read: Subd. 1m. Electric vehicle. deleted text begin In addition to the tax under subdivision 1adeleted text end new text begin (a) Subject to paragraph (b)new text end , a surcharge of deleted text begin $75deleted text end new text begin $200new text end is imposed for an all-electric vehicle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 1a.new text begin The surcharge is in addition to the tax under subdivision 1a.new text end new text begin (b) By October 1 annually, the commissioner must calculate and publish an adjusted surcharge under this subdivision, which applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after the following January 1. Each adjusted surcharge must: new text end new text begin (1) equal: new text end new text begin (i) the surcharge under paragraph (a) as previously adjusted under this paragraph; multiplied by new text end new text begin (ii) one plus the percentage increase, if any, in the gasoline excise tax rate under section 296A.07, subdivision 3, as determined from the rate in effect at the time of calculation compared to the rate to be imposed on the following January 1; and new text end new text begin (2) be rounded to the nearest whole dollar. new text end new text begin (c)new text end Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue from the fee imposed under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1n. new text end new text begin Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle. new text end new text begin (a) Subject to paragraph (b), a surcharge of $100 is imposed for a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 54a. The surcharge is in addition to the tax under subdivision 1a. new text end new text begin (b) By October 1 annually, the commissioner must calculate and publish an adjusted surcharge under this subdivision, which applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after the following January 1. Each adjusted surcharge must: new text end new text begin (1) equal: new text end new text begin (i) the surcharge under paragraph (a) as previously adjusted under this paragraph; multiplied by new text end new text begin (ii) one plus the percentage increase, if any, in the gasoline excise tax rate under section 296A.07, subdivision 3, as determined from the rate in effect at the time of calculation compared to the rate to be imposed on the following January 1; and new text end new text begin (2) be rounded to the nearest whole dollar. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue from the surcharge imposed under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1o. new text end new text begin All-electric motorcycle. new text end new text begin (a) Subject to paragraph (b), a surcharge of $40 is imposed for an all-electric motorcycle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 1b. The surcharge is in addition to the tax under subdivision 1b. new text end new text begin (b) By October 1 annually, the commissioner must calculate and publish an adjusted surcharge under this subdivision, which applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after the following January 1. Each adjusted surcharge must: new text end new text begin (1) equal: new text end new text begin (i) the surcharge under paragraph (a) as previously adjusted under this paragraph; multiplied by new text end new text begin (ii) one plus the percentage increase, if any, in the gasoline excise tax rate under section 296A.07, subdivision 3, as determined from the rate in effect at the time of calculation compared to the rate to be imposed on the following January 1; and new text end new text begin (2) be rounded to the nearest whole dollar. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue from the surcharge imposed under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1p. new text end new text begin Plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle. new text end new text begin (a) Subject to paragraph (b), a surcharge of $20 is imposed for a plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 54c. The surcharge is in addition to the tax under subdivision 1b. new text end new text begin (b) By October 1 annually, the commissioner must calculate and publish an adjusted surcharge under this subdivision, which applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after the following January 1. Each adjusted surcharge must: new text end new text begin (1) equal: new text end new text begin (i) the surcharge under paragraph (a) as previously adjusted under this paragraph; multiplied by new text end new text begin (ii) one plus the percentage increase, if any, in the gasoline excise tax rate under section 296A.07, subdivision 3, as determined from the rate in effect at the time of calculation compared to the rate to be imposed on the following January 1; and new text end new text begin (2) be rounded to the nearest whole dollar. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue from the surcharge imposed under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin All-electric motorcycle. new text end new text begin (a) "All-electric motorcycle" means an electric motorcycle that is solely able to be powered by an electric motor drawing current from rechargeable storage batteries, fuel cells, or other portable sources of electrical current. new text end new text begin (b) All-electric motorcycle excludes a plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 54c. new text end new text begin Plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle. new text end new text begin "Plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle" means an electric motorcycle that: new text end new text begin (1) contains an internal combustion engine and also allows power to be delivered to the drive wheels by a battery-powered electric motor; new text end new text begin (2) when connected to the electrical grid via an electrical outlet, is able to recharge its battery; and new text end new text begin (3) has the ability to travel at least 20 miles powered substantially by electricity. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must renumber the subdivisions in Minnesota Statutes, section 169.011, so that the definitions appear in alphabetical order. The revisor must make necessary cross-reference changes in Minnesota Statutes consistent with the renumbering. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective August 1, 2025. new text end